Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4707
Filing requirements for authorized entities; disapproval.

(1) Any entity authorized pursuant to the laws of this state to operate a health maintenance organization, an accident and health insurance company, or a fraternal benefit society and which is not otherwise authorized pursuant to the laws of this state to offer limited health services on a per capita or fixed prepayment basis may do so by filing for approval with the director the information described in subdivisions (4), (5), (7), (8), (10), (11), (12), and (14) of section 44-4704 and any subsequent material modification or addition thereto.

(2) If the director disapproves the filing, the procedures set forth in subsection (2) of section 44-4705 shall be followed.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 7.